Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-174
National Guard; fire department or district membership or service; effect on duty.

No member of the Nebraska National Guard shall be exempt or relieved from duty by membership or service in any fire department or district.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 65, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 3900;

C.S.1922, § 3298;

C.S.1929, § 55-102;

R.S.1943, § 55-135;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 72, p. 1604.